lt-LT: Montavimo technologija: Paviršinis montavimas; Per kiaurymę; Kita
zh-TW: 安裝技術: 表面黏著; 插入式; 其他
th: เทคโนโลยีการติดตั้ง: ติดตั้งแบบพื้นผิว; แบบผ่านรู; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 安装技术: 表面贴装; 通孔; 其他
nb: Monteringsteknologi: Overflatemontering; Gjennomhull; Annet
pt-BR: Tecnologia de montagem: Montagem superficial; Through-hole; Outro
ko: 장착 기술: 표면 실장; 관통 홀; 기타
nl: Montage technologie: Oppervlaktemontage; Doorsteek; Andere
sk-SK: Montážna technológia: Povrchová montáž; Cez otvor; Iné
de: Montagetechnologie: Oberflächenmontage; Durchsteckmontage; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Tehnologija montaže: Površinska montaža; Skozi luknjo; Drugo
fr: Technologie de montage: Montage en surface; Traversant; Autre
vi: Công nghệ lắp đặt: Gắn bề mặt; Xuyên lỗ; Khác
hr-HR: Tehnologija montiranja: Površinska montaža; Kroz rupu; Ostalo
ja: 実装技術: 表面実装; スルーホール; その他
it: Tecnologia di montaggio: Montaggio superficiale; A foro passante; Altro
fi: Asennustekniikka: Pinta-asennus; Läpireikäasennus; Muu
da: Monteringsteknologi: Overflademontering; Gennemgående hul; Andet
hu: Szerelési technológia: Felületre szerelhető; Furatszerelt; Egyéb
el: Τεχνολογία στήριξης: Επιφανειακής τοποθέτησης; Διαμπερούς οπής; Άλλο
tr: Montaj teknolojisi: Yüzey montaj; Delikli montaj; Diğer
es: Tecnología de montaje: Montaje superficial; De inserción; Otros
bg-BG: Технология на монтаж: Повърхностен монтаж; През отвор; Други
sv: Monteringsteknik: Ytmonterad; Genomgående hål; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tecnologia de montagem: Montagem superficial; Montagem through-hole; Outro
ro-RO: Tehnologie de montare: Montare pe suprafață; Montare prin găuri; Altele
ru: Технология монтажа: Поверхностный монтаж; Сквозной монтаж; Другой
pl: Technologia montażu: Montaż powierzchniowy; Montaż przewlekany; Inne
cs: Montážní technologie: Povrchová montáž; Vývodová montáž; Jiné
en: Mounting technology: Surface-mount; Through-hole; Other